Hawaii statutes.
[§451D-3] Powers. (a) In addition to
any other powers conferred by law, the boards shall have the following powers:

(1) To establish by rule an inactive license category
for those not currently practicing in the State, including the procedure and
conditions for activation of the license;

(2) To establish by rule a retired license category
including the procedure and conditions for activation of the license.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the boards and the department may communicate or cooperate with any
federal, state, or county licensing board or agency, or any other federal,
state, or county agency which is investigating an applicant or a licensee, on
matters pertaining to the professional qualifications or fitness of the applicant
or licensee. All disciplinary actions taken by the boards, including license
denials, shall be matters of public record and be promptly reported by the
board to any central disciplinary data bank or clearinghouse in the United
States, to the state professional societies, to the state hospital association,
and, upon request, to any health care facility. Voluntary surrender of, and
voluntary limitations on, the license of any person shall be a matter of public
record and shall be reported to the disciplinary [data] banks or
clearinghouses, to the state professional societies, to the state hospital
association, and, upon request, to any health care facility in the State. [L
1987, c 67, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next